Hawaii statutes.
§142-97 Wild cattle through street;
penalty. Whoever drives, leads, or otherwise conducts any wild bull,
bullock, cattle, or other ferocious or dangerous animal in the street of any
village, or in any place of public resort, shall, in case the personal safety
of any person is thereby imminently endangered, be fined not less than $5, nor
more than $500, or in case the personal safety of any person is not so
endangered, be fined not less than $5, nor more than $100. [PC 1869, c 26, §3;
RL 1925, §4394; RL 1935, §6286; RL 1945, §11705; RL 1955, §311-5; HRS §142-97]

Cross References

Riding of animals recklessly,
see §291-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next